New York, session 2025-2026, S3192.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 404-b of the general business law, as amended by 2 chapter 80 of the laws of 2015, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 404-b. Nail specialty; owner responsibilities. 1. In addition to any 4 rules and regulations establishing standards for practices and oper- 5 ations by licensees under this article[,]: (a) in order to ensure the 6 health, safety and welfare within appearance enhancement businesses, all 7 owners and operators of appearance enhancement businesses which practice 8 nail specialty shall make available for use, gloves and facemasks for 9 nail speciality licensees and trainees who work in such businesses; and 10 (b) in order to ensure all customers are aware of any charges or fees 11 for the services they receive, all owners and operators of appearance 12 enhancement businesses which practice nail speciality shall: (i) post, 13 at each counter or desk at which orders are placed, services are 14 provided and/or payment is made, a list conspicuously displaying the 15 current price of the basic services provided. Such price list shall also 16 disclose factors which may cause the price to be higher than the basic 17 price, and the range of the possible additional charges when such vari- 18 ables pertain; and (ii) ensure all licensees and trainees who work in 19 such businesses inform customers of any additional charges before 20 performing services which incur such additional charges. 21 2. In addition to any other penalties pursuant to the provisions of 22 this article, violation of this section shall be punishable by a civil 23 penalty of five hundred dollars for each violation. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07318-02-5 S. 3192 2 1 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 2 have become a law.